Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.077

Small loan endorsement—Application—Form—Information—Exemption from disclosure—Fees.

(1) Each application for a small loan endorsement to a check casher or check seller license must be in writing and in a form prescribed by the director and shall contain the following information:

(a) The legal name, residence, and business address of the applicant, and if the applicant is a partnership, corporation, or association, the name and address of every member, partner, officer, and director thereof;

(b) The street and mailing address of each location where the licensee will engage in the business of making small loans;

(c) A surety bond, or other security allowed under RCW 31.45.030, in the amount required; and

(d) Any other pertinent information, including financial statements, as the director may require with respect to the licensee and its directors, officers, trustees, members, or employees.

(2) Any information in the application regarding the licensee's personal residential address or telephone number, and any trade secrets of the licensee as defined under RCW 19.108.010 including any financial statement that is a trade secret, is exempt from the public records disclosure requirements of chapter 42.56 RCW.

(3) The application shall be filed together with an investigation and review fee established by rule by the director. Fees collected shall be deposited to the credit of the financial services regulation fund in accordance with RCW 43.320.110.

[ 2005 c 274 s 256; 2003 c 86 s 9; 2001 c 177 s 13; 1995 c 18 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 177: See note following RCW 43.320.080.